Florida, session 2026, HB289.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 768.18, Florida Statutes, is reordered
and amended to read:
768.18 Definitions.—As used in ss. 768.16-768.26:
(1)(2) "Minor children" means children under 25 years of
age, notwithstanding the age of majority.
(2)(5) "Net accumulations" means the part of the
decedent's expected net business or salary income, including
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb289-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 289 2026
pension benefits, that the decedent probably would have retained
as savings and left as part of her or his estate if the decedent
had lived her or his normal life expectancy. "Net business or
salary income" is the part of the decedent's probable gross
income after taxes, excluding income from investments continuing
beyond death, that remains after deducting the decedent's
personal expenses and support of survivors, excluding
contributions in kind.
(3)(4) "Services" means tasks, usually of a household
nature, regularly performed by the decedent that will be a
necessary expense to the survivors of the decedent. These
services may vary according to the identity of the decedent and
survivor and shall be determined under the particular facts of
each case.
(4)(3) "Support" includes contributions in kind as well as
money.
(5)(1) "Survivors" means the decedent's spouse, children,
parents, and, when partly or wholly dependent on the decedent
for support or services, any blood relatives and adoptive
brothers and sisters. It includes the child born out of wedlock
of a mother, but not the child born out of wedlock of the father
unless the father has recognized a responsibility for the
child's support. It also includes the parents of an unborn
child.
(6) "Unborn child" has the same meaning as in s.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb289-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 289 2026
775.021(5)(e).
Section 2. Section 768.19, Florida Statutes, is amended to
read:
768.19 Right of action.—
(1) When the death of a person is caused by the wrongful
act, negligence, default, or breach of contract or warranty of
any person, including those occurring on navigable waters, and
the event would have entitled the person injured to maintain an
action and recover damages if death had not ensued, the person
or watercraft that would have been liable in damages if death
had not ensued shall be liable for damages as specified in this
act notwithstanding the death of the person injured, although
death was caused under circumstances constituting a felony.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, a
wrongful death action for the death of an unborn child may not
be brought against the mother of the unborn child, or against a
health care provider as defined in s. 766.202, for lawful
medical care provided in compliance with the applicable standard
of care, including, but not limited to, care related to assisted
reproductive technologies as defined in s. 742.13, provided with
the consent of the mother.
Section 3. Subsection (4) and paragraph (a) of subsection
(6) of section 768.21, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
768.21 Damages.—All potential beneficiaries of a recovery
for wrongful death, including the decedent's estate, shall be
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb289-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 289 2026
identified in the complaint, and their relationships to the
decedent shall be alleged. Damages may be awarded as follows:
(4) Each parent of a deceased minor child or an unborn
child may also recover for mental pain and suffering from the
date of injury. Each parent of an adult child may also recover
for mental pain and suffering if there are no other survivors.
(6) The decedent's personal representative may recover for
the decedent's estate the following:
(a) Loss of earnings of the deceased from the date of
injury to the date of death, less lost support of survivors
excluding contributions in kind, with interest. Loss of the
prospective net accumulations of an estate, which might
reasonably have been expected but for the wrongful death,
reduced to present money value, may also be recovered:
1. If the decedent's survivors include a surviving spouse
or lineal descendants; or
2. If the decedent is not a minor child or an unborn child
as those terms are defined in s. 768.18 s. 768.18(2), there are
no lost support and services recoverable under subsection (1),
and there is a surviving parent.

Evidence of remarriage of the decedent's spouse is admissible.
Section 4. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.

Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb289-01-c1